Illinois, session 104th, HB507.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workplace Transparency Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-35 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 96/1-35)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-23 and 8104-320)9    Sec. 1-35. Costs and attorney's fees. An employee, 10prospective employee, or former employee shall be entitled to 11reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in challenging a 12contract for violation of this Act upon a final, 13non-appealable action in favor of the employee, prospective 14employee, or former employee on the question of the validity 15and enforceability of the contract.16(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.) 17    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-23 and 18104-320)19    Sec. 1-35. Compensatory Consequential damages, costs, and 20attorney's fees. An employee, prospective employee, or former 21employee shall be entitled to compensatory consequential 22damages, in addition to reasonable attorney's fees and costs   HB0507 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 04369 SPS 14395 b1incurred in challenging a contract for violation of this Act 2upon a final, non-appealable action in favor of the employee, 3prospective employee, or former employee on the question of 4the validity and enforceability of the contract or defending 5an action for breach of a confidentiality agreement pursuant 6to this Act.7(Source: P.A. 104-23, eff. 1-1-26; 102-320, eff. 1-1-26.) 8    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 9changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 10that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 11represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 12not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 13made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 14Public Act. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 161, 2026.